Massachusetts, session 194th, H3486.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 133 of Chapter 164 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition is hereby amended by adding in the third paragraph at line 12 after the words
“plant.” The following sentence:
“Any municipal lighting plant providing emergency mutual aid may sell, rent, or lease
equipment, fixtures, and goods of any description related to the provision of emergency mutual
aid”
And said section is further amended by adding after the fifth paragraph the following
sentence:
“Any employee of a municipal lighting plant providing emergency mutual aid, shall be
covered by the provisions of chapter thirty-two, sections one to twenty-eight, inclusive, as may
be amended from time to time, and shall have the same rights and privileges thereunder, as if
of 2

performing such duties within the scope of his employment including voluntary assignments
authorized by the employer.”
And said section is further amended by adding in the sixth paragraph at line 27 after the
words “utility”, the following words:
“or its employees”
of 2